Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.025

Qualifications.

A person who files a declaration of candidacy for the office of sheriff after September 1, 1979, shall have, within twelve months of assuming office, a certificate of completion of a basic law enforcement training program which complies with standards adopted by the criminal justice training commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080 and * 43.101.160.

This requirement does not apply to persons holding the office of sheriff in any county on September 1, 1979.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 153 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.101.160 was repealed by 1983 c 197 s 55, effective June 30, 1987.